Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-722
State boiler inspector; inspection; exception;
contract with authorized inspection agency; certification.

(1)
Except as provided in subsections
(3) and (4) of this section, the state boiler inspector shall
inspect or cause to be inspected at least once every twelve months all boilers
required to be inspected by the Boiler Inspection Act to determine whether
the boilers are in a safe and satisfactory condition and properly constructed
and maintained for the purpose for which the boiler is used, except that (a)
hobby boilers, steam farm traction engines, portable and stationary show engines,
and portable and stationary show boilers, which are not otherwise exempted
from the act pursuant to section 48-726, shall be subject to inspection at
least once every twenty-four months and (b) the commissioner may, by rule
and regulation, establish inspection periods for pressure vessels of more
than twelve months, but not to exceed the inspection period recommended in
the National Board Inspection Code or the American Petroleum Institute Pressure
Vessel Inspection Code API-510 for pressure vessels being used for similar
purposes. In order to ensure that inspections are performed in a timely manner,
the department may contract with an authorized inspection agency to perform
any inspection authorized under the Boiler Inspection Act. If the department
contracts with an authorized inspection agency to perform inspections, such
contract shall be in writing and shall contain an indemnification clause wherein
the authorized inspection agency agrees to indemnify and defend the department
for loss occasioned by negligent or tortious acts committed by special inspectors
employed by such authorized inspection agency when performing inspections
on behalf of the department.

(2) No boilers required to be inspected by the act shall be operated
without valid and current certification pursuant to rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the commissioner in accordance with the requirements
of the Administrative Procedure Act. The owner of any boiler installed after
September 2, 1973, shall file a manufacturer's data report covering the construction
of such boiler with the state boiler inspector. Such reports shall be used
to assist the state boiler inspector in the certification of boilers. No boiler
required to be inspected by the Boiler Inspection Act shall be operated at
any type of public gathering or show without first being inspected and certified
as to its safety by the state boiler inspector or a special inspector commissioned
pursuant to section 48-731. Antique engines with boilers may be brought into
the state from other states without inspection, but inspection as provided
in this section shall be made and the boiler certified as safe before being
operated.

(3) The commissioner may, by rule and regulation, waive the inspection
of unfired pressure vessels registered with the State of Nebraska if the commissioner
finds that the owner or user of the unfired pressure vessel follows a safety
inspection and repair program that is based upon nationally recognized standards.

(4) A boiler that is
used as a water heater to supply potable hot water and that is not otherwise
exempt from inspection under the act pursuant to section 48-726 shall be subject
to inspection at least once every twenty-four months in accordance with a
schedule of inspection established by the commissioner by rule and regulation.

Laws 1943, c. 112, § 2(1), p. 392;

R.S.1943, § 48-702;

Laws 1961, c. 235, § 5, p. 698;

Laws 1971, LB 886, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 481, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 48-702;

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 438, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 641, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 66, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB226, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB627, § 1.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.